Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-108 Nonresident licensing.
(a) Except as provided in section 431:9A-112, a nonresident applicant shall
receive a nonresident producer license if:

(1) The applicant is currently licensed and is in
good standing as a resident producer in the applicant's home state;

(2) The applicant has submitted the proper request
for licensure and has paid the fees required by section 431:7-101;

(3) The applicant has submitted or transmitted to the
commissioner the application for licensure that the applicant submitted to the
applicant's home state, or in lieu of the same, a completed uniform
application; and

(4) The applicant's home state awards nonresident
producer licenses to residents of this State on the same basis.

(b) The commissioner may verify the producer's
licensing status through the producer database maintained by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates, or subsidiaries.

(c) A nonresident producer who moves from one
state to another state or a resident producer who moves from this State to
another state shall file a change of address with the commissioner and shall
provide certification from the new resident state within thirty days of the
change of legal residence. No fee or license application shall be required. Failure
to timely inform the commissioner of a change in address shall result in a
penalty pursuant to section 431:2-203.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this article, an applicant licensed as a limited line credit insurance producer
or other type of limited lines producer in the person's home state shall
receive a nonresident limited lines producer license, pursuant to subsection
(a), granting the same scope of authority as granted under the license issued
by the producer's home state. Limited lines insurance authority is any
authority granted by the home state, that restricts the authority of the
license to less than the total authority prescribed in the associated major
lines pursuant to section 431:9A-107(a)(1) through (5). [L 2001, c 216, pt of
§2; am L 2003, c 212, §62; am L 2006, c 154, §28; am L 2012, c 66, §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next